District of Columbia statutes.
46-510

Application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-82, § 11, 42 DCR 6770
1981 Ed., § 30-150.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 9 of the Uniform Premarital Agreement Act.